src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-puika_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - puika: # Noun 'eng boy, arm/fin poika' - full paradigm /http://ezis.ailab.lv:8182/inflect/json/en/puika/ declension_4
     puika+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: puika
     puika+N+Msc+Sg+Gen: puikas
     puika+N+Msc+Sg+Dat: puikam
     puika+N+Msc+Sg+Acc: puiku
     puika+N+Msc+Sg+Loc: puikā
     puika+N+Msc+Sg+Voc: puika
     puika+N+Msc+Pl+Nom: puikas
     puika+N+Msc+Pl+Gen: puiku
     puika+N+Msc+Pl+Dat: puikām
     puika+N+Msc+Pl+Acc: puikas
     puika+N+Msc+Pl+Loc: puikās
     puika+N+Msc+Pl+Voc: puikas
